Illinois, session 104th, SB3790.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 53-55 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-55)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.3-55)7    Sec. 3-55. Multistate exemption. To prevent actual or 8likely multistate taxation, the tax imposed by this Act does 9not apply to the use of tangible personal property in this 10State under the following circumstances:11    (a) The use, in this State, of tangible personal property 12acquired outside this State by a nonresident individual and 13brought into this State by the individual for his or her own 14use while temporarily within this State or while passing 15through this State.16    (b) (Blank).17    (c) The use, in this State, by owners or lessors, lessees, 18or shippers of tangible personal property that is utilized by 19interstate carriers for hire for use as rolling stock moving 20in interstate commerce as long as so used by the interstate 21carriers for hire, and equipment operated by a 22telecommunications provider, licensed as a common carrier by 23the Federal Communications Commission, which is permanently   SB3790- 2 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1installed in or affixed to aircraft moving in interstate 2commerce.3    (d) The use, in this State, of tangible personal property 4that is acquired outside this State and caused to be brought 5into this State by a person who has already paid a tax in 6another State in respect to the sale, purchase, or use of that 7property, to the extent of the amount of the tax properly due 8and paid in the other State.9    (e) The temporary storage, in this State, of tangible 10personal property that is acquired outside this State and 11that, after being brought into this State and stored here 12temporarily, is used solely outside this State or is 13physically attached to or incorporated into other tangible 14personal property that is used solely outside this State, or 15is altered by converting, fabricating, manufacturing, 16printing, processing, or shaping, and, as altered, is used 17solely outside this State.18    (f) The temporary storage in this State of building 19materials and fixtures that are acquired either in this State 20or outside this State by an Illinois registered combination 21retailer and construction contractor, and that the purchaser 22thereafter uses outside this State by incorporating that 23property into real estate located outside this State.24    (g) The use or purchase of tangible personal property by a 25common carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 26possession of the property in Illinois, and that transports   SB3790- 3 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 2transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a standard 3uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the property as 4the shipper or consignor of the property to a destination 5outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.6    (h) Except as provided in subsections (h-1) and (h-1.5), 7the use, in this State, of a motor vehicle that was sold in 8this State to a nonresident, even though the motor vehicle is 9delivered to the nonresident in this State, if the motor 10vehicle is not to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away 11permit is issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 123-603 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 13purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to the 14motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. The 15issuance of the drive-away permit or having the out-of-state 16registration plates to be transferred shall be prima facie 17evidence that the motor vehicle will not be titled in this 18State.19    (h-1) The exemption under subsection (h) does not apply if 20the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does not 21allow a reciprocal exemption for the use in that state of a 22motor vehicle sold and delivered in that state to an Illinois 23resident but titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this 24Act on the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident 25of another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 26shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax on   SB3790- 4 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is a 2resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax that 3would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the time of the 4sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, signed under 5penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to title the vehicle 6in the state in which the purchaser is a resident within 30 7days after the sale and of the fact of the payment to the State 8of Illinois of tax in an amount equivalent to the state's rate 9of tax on taxable property in his or her state of residence and 10shall submit the statement to the appropriate tax collection 11agency in his or her state of residence. In addition, the 12retailer must retain a signed copy of the statement in his or 13her records. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 14require the removal of the vehicle from this state following 15the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in the purchaser's 16state of residence if the purchaser titles the vehicle in his 17or her state of residence within 30 days after the date of 18sale. The tax collected under this Act in accordance with this 19subsection (h-1) shall be proportionately distributed as if 20the tax were collected at the 6.25% general rate imposed under 21this Act. 22    (h-1.5) There is a rebuttable presumption that the 23exemption under subsection (h) does not apply if the purchaser 24is a limited liability company and a member of the limited 25liability company is a resident of Illinois. This presumption 26may be rebutted by other evidence, such as evidence the motor   SB3790- 5 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1vehicle is insured for primary use at an address outside of 2Illinois or evidence that the motor vehicle will be 3permanently stored or garaged at a physical address outside 4Illinois. 5    (h-2) The following exemptions apply with respect to 6certain aircraft:7        (1) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed under 8    this Act on the purchase of an aircraft, as defined in 9    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 10    following conditions are met:11            (A) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 12        after the later of either the issuance of the final 13        billing for the purchase of the aircraft or the 14        authorized approval for return to service, completion 15        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 16        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 17        required by 14 C.F.R. 91.407;18            (B) the aircraft is not based or registered in 19        this State after the purchase of the aircraft; and20            (C) the purchaser provides the Department with a 21        signed and dated certification, on a form prescribed 22        by the Department, certifying that the requirements of 23        this item (1) are met. The certificate must also 24        include the name and address of the purchaser, the 25        address of the location where the aircraft is to be 26        titled or registered, the address of the primary   SB3790- 6 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1        physical location of the aircraft, and other 2        information that the Department may reasonably 3        require.4        (2) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed under 5    this Act on the use of an aircraft, as defined in Section 3 6    of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, that is temporarily 7    located in this State for the purpose of a prepurchase 8    evaluation if all of the following conditions are met:9            (A) the aircraft is not based or registered in 10        this State after the prepurchase evaluation; and11            (B) the purchaser provides the Department with a 12        signed and dated certification, on a form prescribed 13        by the Department, certifying that the requirements of 14        this item (2) are met. The certificate must also 15        include the name and address of the purchaser, the 16        address of the location where the aircraft is to be 17        titled or registered, the address of the primary 18        physical location of the aircraft, and other 19        information that the Department may reasonably 20        require.21        (3) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed under 22    this Act on the use of an aircraft, as defined in Section 3 23    of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, that is temporarily 24    located in this State for the purpose of a post-sale 25    customization if all of the following conditions are met:26            (A) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days   SB3790- 7 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1        after the authorized approval for return to service, 2        completion of the maintenance record entry, and 3        completion of the test flight and ground test for 4        inspection, as required by 14 C.F.R. 91.407;5            (B) the aircraft is not based or registered in 6        this State either before or after the post-sale 7        customization; and8            (C) the purchaser provides the Department with a 9        signed and dated certification, on a form prescribed 10        by the Department, certifying that the requirements of 11        this item (3) are met. The certificate must also 12        include the name and address of the purchaser, the 13        address of the location where the aircraft is to be 14        titled or registered, the address of the primary 15        physical location of the aircraft, and other 16        information that the Department may reasonably 17        require.18    If tax becomes due under this subsection (h-2) because of 19the purchaser's use of the aircraft in this State, the 20purchaser shall file a return with the Department and pay the 21tax on the fair market value of the aircraft. This return and 22payment of the tax must be made no later than 30 days after the 23aircraft is used in a taxable manner in this State. The tax is 24based on the fair market value of the aircraft on the date that 25it is first used in a taxable manner in this State.26    For purposes of this subsection (h-2):  SB3790- 8 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or otherwise 2used, excluding post-sale customizations as defined in this 3Section, for 10 or more days in each 12-month period 4immediately following the date of the sale of the aircraft.5    "Post-sale customization" means any improvement, 6maintenance, or repair that is performed on an aircraft 7following a transfer of ownership of the aircraft.8    "Prepurchase evaluation" means an examination of an 9aircraft to provide a potential purchaser with information 10relevant to the potential purchase.11    "Registered in this State" means an aircraft registered 12with the Department of Transportation, Aeronautics Division, 13or titled or registered with the Federal Aviation 14Administration to an address located in this State. 15    This subsection (h-2) is exempt from the provisions of 16Section 3-90. 17    (i) Beginning July 1, 1999, the use, in this State, of fuel 18acquired outside this State and brought into this State in the 19fuel supply tanks of locomotives engaged in freight hauling 20and passenger service for interstate commerce. This subsection 21is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.22    (j) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 232016, and beginning again on July 1, 2026 and through June 30, 242031, the use of tangible personal property purchased from an 25Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 26purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of   SB3790- 9 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1the property in Illinois, temporarily store the property in 2Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently transporting it 3outside this State for use or consumption thereafter solely 4outside this State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, 5fabricated, or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated 6into other tangible personal property to be transported 7outside this State and thereafter used or consumed solely 8outside this State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to 9rules adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 10Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 11with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 12this subsection (j). The permit issued under this subsection 13(j) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the manner 14specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to purchase 15tangible personal property from a retailer exempt from the 16taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain all 17necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 18consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 19the State of Illinois.20(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 21    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 22Section 3-45 as follows: 23    (35 ILCS 110/3-45)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.33-45)24    Sec. 3-45. Multistate exemption. To prevent actual or   SB3790- 10 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1likely multistate taxation, the tax imposed by this Act does 2not apply to the use of tangible personal property in this 3State under the following circumstances:4    (a) The use, in this State, of property acquired outside 5this State by a nonresident individual and brought into this 6State by the individual for his or her own use while 7temporarily within this State or while passing through this 8State.9    (b) The use, in this State, of property that is acquired 10outside this State and that is moved into this State for use as 11rolling stock moving in interstate commerce.12    (c) The use, in this State, of property that is acquired 13outside this State and caused to be brought into this State by 14a person who has already paid a tax in another state in respect 15to the sale, purchase, or use of that property, to the extent 16of the amount of the tax properly due and paid in the other 17state.18    (d) The temporary storage, in this State, of property that 19is acquired outside this State and that after being brought 20into this State and stored here temporarily, is used solely 21outside this State or is physically attached to or 22incorporated into other property that is used solely outside 23this State, or is altered by converting, fabricating, 24manufacturing, printing, processing, or shaping, and, as 25altered, is used solely outside this State.26    (e) Beginning July 1, 1999, the use, in this State, of fuel   SB3790- 11 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1acquired outside this State and brought into this State in the 2fuel supply tanks of locomotives engaged in freight hauling 3and passenger service for interstate commerce. This subsection 4is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.5    (f) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 62016, and beginning again on July 1, 2026 and through June 30, 72031, the use of tangible personal property purchased from an 8Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 9purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of 10the property in Illinois, temporarily store the property in 11Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently transporting it 12outside this State for use or consumption thereafter solely 13outside this State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, 14fabricated, or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated 15into other tangible personal property to be transported 16outside this State and thereafter used or consumed solely 17outside this State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to 18rules adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 19Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 20with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 21this subsection (f). The permit issued under this subsection 22(f) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the manner 23specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to purchase 24tangible personal property from a retailer exempt from the 25taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain all 26necessary books and records to substantiate the use and   SB3790- 12 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 2the State of Illinois.3(Source: P.A. 97-73, eff. 6-30-11.) 4    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 3-5 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 115/3-5)7    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. The following tangible personal 8property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:9    (1) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 10association, foundation, institution, or organization, other 11than a limited liability company, that is organized and 12operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for the 13benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the personal 14property was not purchased by the enterprise for the purpose 15of resale by the enterprise.16    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 17Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 18operating, or promoting the county fair.19    (3) Personal property purchased by any not-for-profit arts 20or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 21by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 22under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 23is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 24support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or   SB3790- 13 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 2music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 3orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 4organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 5and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 6effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 7otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 8purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 9by the Department.10    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 11coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 12United States of America, or the government of any foreign 13country, and bullion.14    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 152004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 16equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 17and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 18purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 19primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 20chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 21chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 22immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 23July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 24in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 25exemption under Section 2 of this Act.26    (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored student   SB3790- 14 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1organization affiliated with an elementary or secondary school 2located in Illinois.3    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 4including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 5purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 6State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 7replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 8machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 9implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 10Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 11chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 12to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 13Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 14registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 15polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 16overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 17equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 18tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 19motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 20on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 21of the tender is separately stated.22    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 23farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 24installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 25limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 26or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not   SB3790- 15 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 2software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 3such equipment.4    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 5sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 6computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 7facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 8to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 9crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 10agricultural chemicals. 11    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 12also includes electrical power generation equipment used 13primarily for production agriculture. 14    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 153-55.16    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 17to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 18to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 19conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 20destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 21the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 22domestic stopovers.23    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 24to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 25used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 26its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is   SB3790- 16 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 2United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 3at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 4origination to the city of final destination on the same 5aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 6that aircraft. 7    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 8stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 9food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 10service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 11substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 12in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 13beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 14imposed.15    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 16and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 17rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 18pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 19(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 20lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 21exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 22machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 23motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 24Vehicle Code.25    (11) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 26repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including   SB3790- 17 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 2to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 3photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.4    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 5mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 6reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 7equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 8excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 9Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 10Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 11for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 12(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 13during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1416, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).15    (13) Beginning January 1, 1992 and through June 30, 2016, 16food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 17premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 18soft drinks and food that has been prepared for immediate 19consumption) and prescription and non-prescription medicines, 20drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 21materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 22use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 23assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 24resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 25the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 26in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the   SB3790- 18 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.2    (14) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 3for direct agricultural production.4    (15) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 5meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 6Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 7Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 8Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 9racing for prizes. This item (15) is exempt from the 10provisions of Section 3-55, and the exemption provided for 11under this item (15) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 121995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 13January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 14such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 15ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1695-88).17    (16) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 18any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 19analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor 20who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 21executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 22hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 23identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 24the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.25    (17) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 26property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or in   SB3790- 19 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental body that 2has been issued an active tax exemption identification number 3by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 4Occupation Tax Act.5    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 6December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 7before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 8for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 9disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 10manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 11corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 12that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 13number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 14who reside within the declared disaster area.15    (19) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 16December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 17before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 18the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 19including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 20access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 21water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 22purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 23facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 24State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 25Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 26in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the   SB3790- 20 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1disaster.2    (20) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold at a 3"game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is used 4in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 5provisions of Section 3-55.6    (21) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 71-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 8corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 9foundation, or institution that is determined by the 10Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 11educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 12corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 13foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 14for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 15schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 16useful branches of learning by methods common to public 17schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 18intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 19schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 20organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 21study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 22individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 23technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 24occupation.25    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 26including food, purchased through fundraising events for the   SB3790- 21 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 2a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 3the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 4district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 5parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 6does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 7private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 8entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 9another individual or entity that sold the property for the 10purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 11from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 12exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.13    (23) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 142001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 15serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 16other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 17Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 18and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 19amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 20paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 21commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 22paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.23    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 24Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 25utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 26diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to   SB3790- 22 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 2longer executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 3hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 4identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 5the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 6from the provisions of Section 3-55.7    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 8Public Act 92-227), personal property sold to a lessor who 9leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 10executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 11governmental body that has been issued an active tax exemption 12identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 13the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 14from the provisions of Section 3-55.15    (26) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 162016, and beginning again on June 30, 2026 and through June 30, 172031, tangible personal property purchased from an Illinois 18retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized purchasing 19activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of the property 20in Illinois, temporarily store the property in Illinois (i) 21for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside this 22State for use or consumption thereafter solely outside this 23State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, 24or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other 25tangible personal property to be transported outside this 26State and thereafter used or consumed solely outside this   SB3790- 23 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules 2adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 3Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 4with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 5this paragraph (26). The permit issued under this paragraph 6(26) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 7manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 8purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 9from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain 10all necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 11consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 12the State of Illinois.13    (27) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 14used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 15supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 16Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 17corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 18under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 19paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 20    (28) Tangible personal property sold to a 21public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 2211-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 23constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 24only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 25transferred to the municipality without any further 26consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time   SB3790- 24 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 2retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 3instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 4connection with the development of the municipal convention 5hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 6corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 7Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 8of Section 3-55. 9    (29) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 10December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 11and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 12of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 13repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 14includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 15refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 16maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 17exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 18components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 19replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 20power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 21installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 22supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 23sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 24latex gloves, and protective films. 25    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2631, 2023, this exemption applies only to the transfer of   SB3790- 25 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1qualifying tangible personal property incident to the 2modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 3or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 4Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 5repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 6have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 7accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 8The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 9commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 10service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 11129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 1, 2024 12through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies only to the 13transfer of qualifying tangible personal property incident to: 14(A) the modification, refurbishment, completion, repair, 15replacement, or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) 16hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 17approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 18Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 19operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 20Regulations; and (B) the modification, replacement, repair, 21and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants without 22regard to whether or not those persons meet the qualifications 23of item (A).24    The changes made to this paragraph (29) by Public Act 2598-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the 26General Assembly that the exemption under this paragraph (29)   SB3790- 26 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1applies continuously from January 1, 2010 through December 31, 22024; however, no claim for credit or refund is allowed for 3taxes paid as a result of the disallowance of this exemption on 4or after January 1, 2015 and prior to February 5, 2020 (the 5effective date of Public Act 101-629).6    (30) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 72026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 8    (31) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 9who is exempt from tax by operation of federal law. This 10paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 11    (32) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 12construction or operation of a data center that has been 13granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 14Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 15personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 16tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 17of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 18have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 191, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 20obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 21equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 22supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 23purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 24qualified. 25    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 26grant a certificate of exemption under this item (32) to   SB3790- 27 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 2Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 3Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 4    For the purposes of this item (32): 5        "Data center" means a building or a series of 6    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 7    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 8    the State of Illinois. 9        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 10    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 11    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 12    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 13    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 14    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 15    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 16    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 17    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 18    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 19    systems; other cabling; and other data center 20    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 21    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 22    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 23    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 24    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 25    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 26    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible   SB3790- 28 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    personal property; and all other tangible personal 2    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 3    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 4    property" also includes building materials physically 5    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 6    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 7    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 8    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 9    Economic Opportunity. 10    This item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 113-55. 12    (33) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 13collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 14item (33) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. As 15used in this item (33): 16        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 17    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 18    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 19    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 20    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 21    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 22    time of sale. 23        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 24    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 25    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 26    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected   SB3790- 29 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    milk until it is ready for consumption. 2        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 3    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 4    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 5    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 6    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 7    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 8    milk storage bags. 9        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 10    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 11    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 12    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 13    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 14    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 15    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 16    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 17    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 18    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 19    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 20    or distributor. 21        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 22    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 23    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 24    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 25    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 26    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump   SB3790- 30 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    manufacturer or distributor. 2    (34) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 3the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 4Property Act. This item (34) is exempt from the provisions of 5Section 3-55.6    (35) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 7property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 8forces of the United States who presents valid military 9identification and purchases the property using a form of 10payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 11of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 12prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 13transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 14paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 15the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 16years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 17States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 18Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 19Section 3-55. 20    (36) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 21to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 22intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 23Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 24Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 25paragraph (36) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 26    (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in   SB3790- 31 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 2transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 3or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity licensed under the 4Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 5Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 6Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 7Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 8an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 9Facilities Act. This item (37) is exempt from the provisions 10of Section 3-55. 11    (38) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 12Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 13consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 14alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 15use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 16prepared for immediate consumption). This item (38) is exempt 17from the provisions of Section 3-55. 18    (39) The lease of the following tangible personal 19property:20        (1) computer software transferred subject to a license 21    that meets the following requirements:22            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 23        by the licensor and the customer;24                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 25            customer accepts the license by means of an 26            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be   SB3790- 32 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 2            the license will comply with this requirement;3                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 4            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 5            agree" does not comply with this requirement;6            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 7        use of the software;8            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 9        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 10        party (except to a related party) without the 11        permission and continued control of the licensor;12            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 13        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 14        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 15        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 16        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 17        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 18        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 19        the licensor; and20            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 21        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 22        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 23        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 24        forth in the license agreement; and25        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 26    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government   SB3790- 33 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 2    January 1, 2023. 3(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-15, eff. 6-7-23; 4103-9, Article 15, Section 15-15, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 56-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 6eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 7103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-417, eff. 88-15-25.) 9    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 10by changing Section 2-5 as follows: 11    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)12    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 13the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 14lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 15from the tax imposed by this Act:16        (1) Farm chemicals.17        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 18    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 19    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 20    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 21    including individual replacement parts for the machinery 22    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased 23    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 24    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm   SB3790- 34 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 2    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 3    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 4    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered 5    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses 6    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 7    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery 8    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 9    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 10    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 11    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 12    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately 13    stated.14        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 15    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 16    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 17    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, 18    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 19    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 20    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and 21    mapping systems, and other such equipment.22        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 23    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in 24    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 25    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 26    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of   SB3790- 35 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 2    diets and agricultural chemicals. 3        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 4    equipment also includes electrical power generation 5    equipment used primarily for production agriculture. 6        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 7    2-70.8        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 9    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 10    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 11    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 12    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel 13    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 14    or resale.15        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 16    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 17    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, 18    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 19    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 20    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts 21    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 22    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 23    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change 24    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, 25    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 26    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment   SB3790- 36 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    exemption under paragraph (14).2        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 3    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 4    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 5    provisions of Section 2-70.6        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 7    student organization affiliated with an elementary or 8    secondary school located in Illinois.9        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 10    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 11    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.12        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair 13    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 14    the county fair.15        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 16    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 17    by the Department by rule, that it has received an 18    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 19    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 20    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming, 21    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 22    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 23    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts 24    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils, 25    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 26    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act   SB3790- 37 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 2    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 3    an active identification number issued by the Department.4        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 5    association, foundation, institution, or organization, 6    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 7    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for 8    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 9    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 10    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.11        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 12    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a 13    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 14    institution organized and operated exclusively for 15    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 16    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 17    foundation, institution, or organization that has no 18    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 19    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 20    years of age or older. A limited liability company may 21    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 22    limited liability company is organized and operated 23    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1, 24    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this 25    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 26    active identification number issued by the Department.  SB3790- 38 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1        (12) (Blank).2        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 3    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 4    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject 5    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section 6    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 7    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of 8    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 9    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 10    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 11    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 12    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes. 13    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 14    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 15    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 16    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 17    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this 18    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 19    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 20    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire 21    or not. 22        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 23    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is 24    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as 25    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 26    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a   SB3790- 39 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 2    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 3    moving in interstate commerce.4        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the 5    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the 6    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 7    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether 8    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 9    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 10    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 11    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 12    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service 13    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 14    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 15    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 16    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 17    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of 18    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 19    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 20    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 21    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 22    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 23    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The 24    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of 25    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 26    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption   SB3790- 40 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 2    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 3    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.4        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 5    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of 6    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 7    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 8    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 9    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 10    food or beverage function with respect to which the 11    service charge is imposed. 12        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if 13    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 14    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 15    of Section 2-70. 16        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 17    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 18    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 19    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 20    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a 21    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 22    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 23    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.24        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or 25    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 26    government of the United States of America, or the   SB3790- 41 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    government of any foreign country, and bullion.2        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 3    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 4    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover 5    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and 6    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 7    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual 8    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 9    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 10    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 11    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.12        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, 13    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 14    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 15    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 16    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 17    purchased for lease.18        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 19    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 20    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including 21    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 22    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 23    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 24    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on 25    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 26    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date   SB3790- 42 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 2    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 3    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).4        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 5    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 6    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 7    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 8    flight destined for or returning from a location or 9    locations outside the United States without regard to 10    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.11        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 12    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 13    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 14    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 15    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 16    in trade between the United States and any of its 17    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or 18    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 19    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 20    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft. 21        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 22    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 23    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property 24    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.25        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 26    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the   SB3790- 43 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 2    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 3    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 4    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.5        (25) Except as provided in items (25-5) and (25-6) of 6    this Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State to a 7    nonresident even though the motor vehicle is delivered to 8    the nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not 9    to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is 10    issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 11    of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 12    purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to 13    the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. 14    The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 15    out-of-state registration plates to be transferred is 16    prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be 17    titled in this State.18        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 19    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 20    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold 21    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 22    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 23    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of 24    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 25    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 26    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is   SB3790- 44 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 2    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 3    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 4    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to 5    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a 6    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 7    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount 8    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 9    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 10    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 11    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 12    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her 13    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 14    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 15    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 16    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 17    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days 18    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 19    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 20    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25% 21    general rate imposed under this Act. 22        (25-6) There is a rebuttable presumption that the 23    exemption under item (25) does not apply if the purchaser 24    is a limited liability company and a member of the limited 25    liability company is a resident of Illinois. This 26    presumption may be rebutted by other evidence, such as   SB3790- 45 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    evidence the motor vehicle is insured at a garaging or 2    storage address outside Illinois or other evidence of the 3    physical address at which the motor vehicle will be 4    permanently stored or garaged outside Illinois. 5        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed 6    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in 7    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 8    following conditions are met:9            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 10        after the later of either the issuance of the final 11        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 12        authorized approval for return to service, completion 13        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 14        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 15        required by 14 CFR 91.407;16            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in 17        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and18            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 19        records and provides to the Department a signed and 20        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form 21        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the 22        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 23        certificate must also include the name and address of 24        the purchaser, the address of the location where the 25        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 26        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and   SB3790- 46 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1        other information that the Department may reasonably 2        require.3        For purposes of this item (25-7):4        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 5    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as 6    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each 7    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 8    of the aircraft.9        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 10    registered with the Department of Transportation, 11    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 12    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 13    this State.14        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 15    Section 2-70. 16        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of 17    livestock for direct agricultural production.18        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 19    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 20    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American 21    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting 22    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 23    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 24    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the 25    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 26    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for   SB3790- 47 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 2    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 3    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 4    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 5    95-88).6        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized 7    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 8    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 9    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 10    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 11    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 12    exemption identification number by the Department under 13    Section 1g of this Act.14        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 15    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 16    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental 17    body that has been issued an active tax exemption 18    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 19    of this Act.20        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 21    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 22    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 23    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 24    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering 25    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 26    in this State to a corporation, society, association,   SB3790- 48 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 2    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 3    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 4    declared disaster area.5        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 6    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 7    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 8    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 9    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 10    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 11    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 12    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 13    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment 14    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 15    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 16    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the 17    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.18        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 19    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 20    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is 21    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.22        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 23    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 24    donated to a corporation, limited liability company, 25    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 26    determined by the Department to be organized and operated   SB3790- 49 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 2    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 3    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 4    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 5    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that 6    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of 7    learning by methods common to public schools and that 8    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 9    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 10    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 11    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 12    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 13    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 14    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 15    occupation.16        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 17    including food, purchased through fundraising events for 18    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 19    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 20    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity 21    recognized by the school district that consists primarily 22    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 23    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 24    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home 25    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 26    purchases the personal property sold at the events from   SB3790- 50 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    another individual or entity that sold the property for 2    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 3    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 4    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.5        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 6    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that 7    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 8    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 9    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 10    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 11    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 12    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 13    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated 14    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 15    from the provisions of Section 2-70.16        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 17    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed 18    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 19    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 20    for immediate consumption) and prescription and 21    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and 22    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 23    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 24    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V 25    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 26    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home   SB3790- 51 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 2    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 3    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.4        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 5    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose 6    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or 7    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 8    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 9    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 10    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 11    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 12    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 13    of Section 2-70.14        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 15    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 16    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 17    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an 18    active tax exemption identification number by the 19    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 20    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.21        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 22    2016, and beginning again on July 1, 2026 and through June 23    30, 2031, tangible personal property purchased from an 24    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 25    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt 26    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the   SB3790- 52 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 2    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 3    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 4    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 5    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 6    personal property to be transported outside this State and 7    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The 8    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 9    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 10    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 11    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 12    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 13    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 14    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 15    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 16    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall 17    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate 18    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal 19    property outside of the State of Illinois.20        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 21    property used in the construction or maintenance of a 22    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of 23    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 24    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 25    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental 26    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the   SB3790- 53 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    provisions of Section 2-70. 2        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 3    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 4    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 5    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 6    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the 7    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used 8    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 9    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 10    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 11    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 12    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 13    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 14    whether such engines or power plants are installed or 15    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 16    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 17    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 18    latex gloves, and protective films. 19        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 20    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 21    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who 22    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an 23    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 24    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 25    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV 26    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with   SB3790- 54 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 2    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 3    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 4    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 5    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 6    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies 7    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property 8    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 9    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 10    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 11    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 12    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 13    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 14    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage 15    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 16    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to 17    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of 18    item (A).19        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 20    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 21    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this 22    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010 23    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 24    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 25    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 26    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of   SB3790- 55 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    Public Act 101-629).2        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 3    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 4    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 5    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 6    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention 7    hall is transferred to the municipality without any 8    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 9    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 10    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 11    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 12    corporation in connection with the development of the 13    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 14    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in 15    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 16    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 17        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 18    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 19        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 20    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 21    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented 22    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the 23    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 24    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 25    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from 26    the provisions of Section 2-70.  SB3790- 56 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 2    construction or operation of a data center that has been 3    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 4    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 5    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 6    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or 7    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data 8    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 9    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 10    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 11    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 12    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 13    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 14    or leased in the original investment that would have 15    qualified. 16        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 17    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item 18    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section 19    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 20    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 21    Illinois. 22        For the purposes of this item (44): 23            "Data center" means a building or a series of 24        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 25        working servers in one physical location or multiple 26        sites within the State of Illinois.   SB3790- 57 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 2        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 3        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 4        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 5        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 6        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; 7        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure; 8        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 9        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 10        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 11        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 12        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 13        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 14        property, including fixtures; and component parts of 15        any of the foregoing, including installation, 16        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of 17        qualified tangible personal property to generate, 18        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity 19        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 20        property; and all other tangible personal property 21        that is essential to the operations of a computer data 22        center. The term "qualified tangible personal 23        property" also includes building materials physically 24        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 25        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the 26        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the   SB3790- 58 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 2        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 3        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 4    Section 2-70. 5        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 6    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a 7    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due 8    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 9    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 10    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 11    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 12    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 13    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 14    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers 15    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 16    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6 17    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes 18    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the 19    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 20    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 21    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act. 22        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 23    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 24    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 25    2-70. As used in this item (46): 26        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or   SB3790- 59 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 2    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 3    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 4    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 5    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 6    time of sale. 7        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 8    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 9    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 10    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 11    milk until it is ready for consumption. 12        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 13    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 14    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 15    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 16    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 17    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 18    milk storage bags. 19        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 20    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 21    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 22    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 23    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 24    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 25    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 26    ointments, and other similar products that relieve   SB3790- 60 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 2    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 3    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 4    or distributor. 5        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 6    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 7    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 8    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 9    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 10    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 11    manufacturer or distributor. 12        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 13    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 14    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the 15    provisions of Section 2-70. 16        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 17    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 18    forces of the United States who presents valid military 19    identification and purchases the property using a form of 20    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 21    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of 22    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue 23    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 24    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 25    form as documentation of the exemption in their records 26    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the   SB3790- 61 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 2    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 3    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 4        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 5    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 6    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare 7    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or 8    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 9    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 10    the provisions of Section 2-70. 11        (50) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 12    in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that is to be 13    consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 14    alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with 15    adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has 16    been prepared for immediate consumption). This item (50) 17    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 18        (51) Gross receipts from the lease of the following 19    tangible personal property:20            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 21        license that meets the following requirements:22                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement 23            signed by the licensor and the customer;24                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 25                customer accepts the license by means of an 26                electronic signature that is verifiable and   SB3790- 62 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1                can be authenticated and is attached to or 2                made part of the license will comply with this 3                requirement;4                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 5                customer electronically accepts the terms by 6                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this 7                requirement;8                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 9            and use of the software;10                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 11            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 12            third party (except to a related party) without 13            the permission and continued control of the 14            licensor;15                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 16            another copy at minimal or no charge if the 17            customer loses or damages the software, or of 18            permitting the licensee to make and keep an 19            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 20            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 21            books and records, or supported by a notarized 22            statement made under penalties of perjury by the 23            licensor; and24                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 25            copies of the software to the licensor at the end 26            of the license period; this provision is deemed to   SB3790- 63 -LRB104 19634 HLH 33083 b1            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 2            without being set forth in the license agreement; 3            and4            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 5        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 6        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was 7        adopted prior to January 1, 2023. 8(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-20, eff. 6-7-23; 9103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 106-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 11eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 12103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-6, eff. 136-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.